Washington statutes.
RCW 35.06.070

Procedure for advancement—Ballot proposition—Notification of secretary of state.

A ballot proposition authorizing an advancement in classification of a town to a second-class city shall be submitted to the voters of the town if either: (1) Petitions proposing the advancement are submitted to the town clerk that have been signed by voters of the town equal in number to at least ten percent of the voters of the town voting at the last municipal general election; or (2) the town council adopts a resolution proposing the advancement. The clerk shall immediately forward the petitions to the county auditor who shall review the signatures and certify the sufficiency of the petitions.

A ballot proposition authorizing an advancement shall be submitted to the town voters at the next special election date according to RCW 29A.04.330 if the county auditor certifies the petitions as having sufficient valid signatures. The town shall be advanced to a second-class city if the ballot proposition is approved by a simple majority vote, effective when the corporation is actually reorganized and the new officers are elected and qualified. The county auditor shall notify the secretary of state if the advancement of a town to a second-class city is approved.

[ 2006 c 344 s 21; 1994 c 81 s 8; 1965 c 7 s 35.06.070. Prior: 1890 p 142 s 21; RRS s 8942.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 344 ss 1-16 and 18-40: See note following RCW 29A.04.311.